Utah statutes.
32B-12-201.   Commission's power to issue liquor warehousing license.

(1) (a)  Before a person may warehouse, distribute, or transport liquor for resale to a wholesale or retail customer, the person shall first obtain a liquor warehousing license issued by the commission in accordance with this chapter.

(b)  A separate liquor warehousing license is required for each warehousing facility.

(c)  A violation of this Subsection (1) is a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  The commission may issue a liquor warehousing license in accordance with this chapter for the warehousing, distribution, and transportation of liquor.

